Washington statutes.
RCW 43.340.110

Dissolution of authority.

The authority shall dissolve no later than two years from the date of final payment of all of its outstanding bonds and the satisfaction of all outstanding obligations of the authority, except to the extent necessary to remain in existence to fulfill any outstanding covenants or provisions with bondholders or third parties made in accordance with this chapter. Upon dissolution of the authority, all assets of the authority shall be returned to the state and shall be deposited in the state general fund, and the authority shall execute any necessary assignments or instruments, including any assignment of any right, title, or ownership to the state for receipt of payments under the master settlement agreement.

[ 2002 c 365 s 12.]